Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB306.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 201.1 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 201.1. Explanation of Ballot Question and Posting on Internet.--(a) Whenever a proposed constitutional amendment or other State-wide ballot question shall be submitted to the electors of the Commonwealth in referendum, the Attorney General shall prepare a statement in plain English which indicates the purpose, limitations and effects of the ballot question on the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 people of the Commonwealth.(b) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall include such statement in [his] the publication of a proposed constitutional amendment as required by Article XI of the Constitution of Pennsylvania. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall also post on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website a detailed account of each action taken to publish the proposed constitutional amendment, including a copy of the notice and constitutionally required deadline, a listing of the newspapers in which the notice was published and the date of publication and the earliest election date on which the proposed constitutional amendment may be voted on by the electors.(c) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall certify such statement to the county boards of elections who shall publish such statement as a part of the notice of elections required by section 1201 or any other provision of this act. The county board of elections shall also require that at least three copies of such statement be posted in or about the voting room outside the enclosed space with the specimen ballots and other instructions and notices of penalties. In election questions which affect only one county or portion thereof, the county board of elections shall fulfill these requirements in the place of the Attorney General and the Secretary of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0306PN0243 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324